Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Mississippi Fire Prevention Code

§ 45-11-101.
Promulgation; buildings to which code applies; plans for construction of private correctional facilities housing state inmates to be submitted to State Fire Marshal’s office to ensure compliance with Mississippi Fire Prevention Code; examination of local fire prevention codes.

The State Fire Marshal shall promulgate the Mississippi Fire Prevention Code which shall apply to:

All buildings owned by the state or state agencies;

All buildings utilized for public assembly, except in any county or municipality which has adopted a fire prevention code with standards not less stringent than the Mississippi Fire Prevention Code; however, the State Fire Marshal or his authorized representative shall perform investigations or inspections of such buildings only when advised by interested persons of a danger or hazardous inflammable condition existing in any building that would tend to impair the safety of persons or property, or when the State Fire Marshal or his authorized representative believes the investigation or inspection is in the interest of public safety. The investigation or inspection shall be made in accordance with Section 45-11-3;

All buildings, the permits for the construction of which are issued subsequent to July 1, 1978, and which are not less than seventy-five (75) feet in height; provided, however, that in any county or municipality which has adopted a fire prevention code with standards not less stringent than the Mississippi Fire Prevention Code, the provisions and enforcement mechanism thereof shall apply and not the Mississippi Fire Prevention Code;

All buildings, the permits for construction of which are issued subsequent to July 1, 2004, constructed as private correctional facilities that house state inmates. Before such construction, construction plans must be submitted for review and approval to the State Fire Marshal’s Office to ensure compliance with the Mississippi Fire Prevention Code; however, in any county or municipality that has adopted a fire prevention code with standards not less stringent than the Mississippi Fire Prevention Code, the provisions and enforcement mechanism thereof shall apply instead of the Mississippi Fire Prevention Code. All private correctional facilities may be inspected as required by the State Fire Marshal or his duly authorized representative. Inspection fees and expenses authorized by Section 45-11-105(2) shall be assessed for each inspection conducted by the State Fire Marshal’s Office and shall be paid to the State Fire Marshal’s Office;

Any buildings, the permits for construction of which are issued subsequent to July 1, 2004, upon the request of any interested person. The interested person may submit the construction plans to the State Fire Marshal’s Office for review and approval before construction to ensure compliance with the Mississippi Fire Prevention Code; however, in any county or municipality that has adopted a fire prevention code with standards not less stringent than the Mississippi Fire Prevention Code, the provisions and enforcement mechanism thereof shall apply instead of the Mississippi Fire Prevention Code. Inspection fees and expenses authorized by Section 45-11-105(2) shall be assessed for each inspection conducted by the State Fire Marshal’s Office and shall be paid to the State Fire Marshal’s Office;

All buildings, the permits for construction of which are issued subsequent to July 1, 2005, constructed as private fraternity and sorority houses located on state property. Before such construction, construction plans shall be submitted for review and approval to the State Fire Marshal’s Office to ensure compliance with the Mississippi Fire Prevention Code. All private fraternity and sorority houses located on state property may be inspected as required by the State Fire Marshal or his duly authorized representative. All fraternity and sorority houses located on state property shall be equipped with an approved fire alarm and smoke detector system to be in compliance with the National Fire Code (NFPA) Standard 72 as published by the National Fire Protection Association and as same may be revised or amended. All fraternity and sorority houses constructed on state property after April 20, 2005, shall be equipped with an approved automatic fire sprinkler system to be in compliance with the National Fire Code (NFPA) Standard 13 as published by the National Fire Protection Association and as same may be revised or amended.

The State Fire Marshal shall annually examine the fire prevention codes adopted by counties and municipalities within the State of Mississippi and prepare a list thereof specifying which codes have provisions not less stringent than those of the Mississippi Fire Prevention Code.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 502, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 328, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 359, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 527, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 20, 2005.).

§ 45-11-103.
Standards; deviation from standards; automatic sprinkler systems.

The standards embodied in said code shall be based upon and shall be not less stringent than the standards established by the standard fire prevention code as promulgated by the Southern Building Code Congress International, Inc., and as the same may be revised or amended; however, the state fire marshal shall have the authority to deviate from the minimum requirements of such standard fire prevention code when the imposition and enforcement of a specific requirement of the standard fire prevention code would cause unnecessary hardship or when such deviation would enable builders to take advantage of new methods, materials or equipment which is of recognized adequacy.

The Mississippi Fire Prevention Code shall include provisions that every new building over seventy-five (75) feet in height in the State of Mississippi for which a permit is issued after July 1, 1978, shall be equipped throughout the building with a totally automatic sprinkler system designed for life safety and fire prevention and protection. This provision shall include every building over seventy-five (75) feet in height constructed after July 1, 1978, or to any existing building in which twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the floor space is being reconstructed or added thereto. However, public utility company buildings in which water would cause severe damage to equipment such as telephone equipment, computers or electric services, and silos, grain elevators and other structures utilized solely for the storage of agricultural products are exempt from the automatic sprinkler system provisions of the code.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 502, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 45-11-105.
Enforcement of code by State Fire Marshal; Deputy Fire Marshals to have status of law enforcement officer; rules and regulations; cost of fire safety inspections; exceptions for state buildings.

The Mississippi Fire Prevention Code shall be enforced by the State Fire Marshal and such other persons as authorized thereby, including for this reason any county or municipal fire prevention personnel, pertaining to the prevention, inspection or investigation of fires. The State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal and deputy fire marshals shall have the status and powers of a law enforcement officer in performing their duties under the Mississippi Fire Prevention Code as authorized by standards set by Section 45-11-103, Mississippi Code of 1972. The State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal and deputy fire marshals serving under permanent appointment on January 1, 1992, shall not be required to meet any requirements of Section 45-6-11 of the Mississippi Code of 1972. The State Fire Marshal is authorized and empowered to promulgate rules and regulations for the enforcement of the Mississippi Fire Prevention Code.

Applications for fire safety inspections shall be filed with the Office of the State Fire Marshal. An inspection fee of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) and reasonable and necessary travel expenses as provided under Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be assessed for each inspection conducted by the Office of the State Fire Marshal and shall be paid to the Office of the State Fire Marshal.

The inspection fee and expenses authorized under subsection (2) shall not be assessed for the inspection of buildings owned by the State of Mississippi or its political subdivisions or for inspections conducted by local fire departments or other local agencies with authority to conduct inspections or for the inspection of buildings used for religious assemblies.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 502, § 3; Laws, 1992, ch. 328, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 45-11-107.
Application of Sections 45-11-101 through 45-11-111.

Unless otherwise provided, Sections 45-11-101 through 45-11-111 shall apply to new or remodeled buildings, installations, equipment or conditions; however, Sections 45-11-101 through 45-11-111 shall also apply to existing buildings, installations, equipment, conditions and occupancies where safety to life requires compliance with Sections 45-11-101 through 45-11-111, as determined by the state fire marshal.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 502, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 45-11-109.
Actions or proceedings to remedy prohibited acts.

In case any building is constructed or reconstructed or any building is used in violation of the Mississippi Fire Prevention Code or of any ordinance or other regulation made under authority conferred hereby, the state fire marshal or the proper local authorities of any county or municipality, in addition to other remedies, may institute any appropriate action or proceedings to prevent such unlawful construction or reconstruction, to restrain, correct or abate such violation or to prevent the occupancy of said building.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 502, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 45-11-111.
Penalties.

Any person, firm or corporation who shall knowingly and willfully violate the terms or provisions of the Mississippi Fire Prevention Code shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction therefor shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), and in case of continuing violations without reasonable effort on the part of the defendant to correct same, each day the violation continues thereafter shall be a separate offense.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 502, § 6; Laws, 1992, ch. 328, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1992.